Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:





Req. No. 2570 Page 1


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 4-112, as


amended by Section 18, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (26 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 4-112), is amended to read as follows:


Section 4-112. A. The Secretary of the State Election Board


shall devise and distribute a registration application form to be


used for registering voters. Such registration application shall


contain the following information:


1. The applicant’s full name and date of birth, county and


place of residence, and mailing address pursuant to the provisions


of subsection G of this section;


2. A space or section to designate a political party recognized


by the laws of the State of Oklahoma this state with which the


applicant chooses to be affiliated;


3. The Oklahoma driver license or identification card number if


the applicant has been issued a current and valid driver license or


identification card by Service Oklahoma, or if the applicant does


not have a valid Oklahoma driver license or identification card, the


last four digits of the voter’s Social Security number;


4. An oath of the eligibility of the applicant to become a


registered voter; and


5. Such other information as may be deemed necessary by the


Secretary to identify such applicant and to ascertain his or her


eligibility.



Req. No. 2570 Page 2


B. A voter registration application shall be signed by the


applicant in writing. The applicant shall personally subscribe his


or her name to or make his or her mark on the application, and no


agent, representative or employee of the applicant may sign or mark


on the applicant’s behalf. The signature or mark must be the


original, handwritten signature, autograph or mark of the applicant.


No facsimile, reproduction, typewritten or other substitute


signature, autograph or mark will be valid. Notwithstanding any law


to the contrary, the Secretary of the State Election Board shall


prescribe procedures to authorize any person incapable of personally


making a mark to complete a voter registration application with


assistance of an official of any voter registration agency or


licensed operator specified in Sections 4-109.2 and 4-109.3 of this


title. Provided, for applications submitted electronically, in lieu


of the signature requirements set forth in this subsection, the


applicant shall consent to the use of his or her driver license or


identification card signature as provided in Section 4-109.4 of this


title.


C. Persons who do not indicate a recognized political party or


political organization on their registration application shall be


designated as Independents.


D. Any person may apply in writing to the Secretary of the


State Election Board for permission to print, copy or otherwise


prepare and distribute the registration applications designed by the

Req. No. 2570 Page 3


Secretary of the State Election Board. The Secretary may revoke any


such permission at any time.


E. All registration applications shall be distributed to the


public at no charge.


F. The Secretary also shall prescribe procedures to accept and


use the National Mail Voter Registration Form, or its successor, as


required by the National Voter Registration Act of 1993. Provided,


to be accepted as a valid voter registration application, the form


shall include the applicant’s original, handwritten signature,


autograph or mark as described in subsection B of this section.


G. Applicants for voter registration or for change of voter


registration in any way shall provide a residence address and, if


different from the residence address, a mailing address. A


residence address shall include the street address of the residence,


including a full house number, street name or number, apartment or


suite number, if applicable, and zip code. If a street address is


not available for the residence, applicants shall provide such


information as the Secretary of the State Election Board deems


necessary for voter registration purposes. A post office box may


not be given as a residence address. A mailing address, which shall


include the city and zip code, may be the actual emergency


notification or 911 9-1-1 address on file in the local community, a


rural route and box number, a post office box number or a street


address.

Req. No. 2570 Page 4


H. A full or partial Social Security number or driver license


number in a voter registration record or a voter registration


application shall not be considered a public record and shall be


kept confidential by the State Election Board and each county


election board.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-112.1 of Title 26, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Documentary proof of citizenship” means:


a. a legible photocopy of the applicant’s birth


certificate issued by a United States state or


territory, or the District of Columbia, that verifies


citizenship; provided, that if a person has changed


his or her name since birth, that person shall provide


legal documentation of the name change in accordance


with state law,


b. a legible photocopy of pertinent pages of the


applicant’s United States passport identifying the


applicant and the applicant’s passport number or


presentation to an election board official of the


applicant’s United States passport,


c. the applicant’s United States naturalization documents


or the number of the certificate of naturalization.

Req. No. 2570 Page 5


If only the number of the certificate of


naturalization is provided, the applicant shall not be


classified as a verified voter until the number of the


certificate of naturalization is verified with United


States Citizenship and Immigration Services by an


election board official, pursuant to 8 U.S.C., Section


1373(c),


d. other documents or methods of proof of citizenship


that are established pursuant to the Immigration


Reform and Control Act of 1986 or the Immigration and


Nationality Act,


e. the applicant’s Bureau of Indian Affairs card number,


tribal treaty card number, or tribal enrollment


number, or


f. for citizens born abroad, a certificate or report of


birth or consular report of birth abroad issued by the


United States Department of State;


2. “Federal contests” means the contests for the offices of


United States Representative, United States Senator, and President


of the United States;


3. “Federal-only voter” means a voter registered using the


National Mail Voter Registration Form in this state, whose United


States citizenship status has not been verified by an election board



Req. No. 2570 Page 6


official in this state, is only eligible to vote in federal races,


and shall not include any verified voter;


4. “National Mail Voter Registration Form” means the voter


registration application form created and maintained by the United


States Election Assistance Commission pursuant to 52 U.S.C., Section


20508(a)(2); and


5. “Verified voter” means a registered voter in this state


whose United States citizenship has been verified by an election


board official in this state.


B. Every person who applies to register to vote in this state,


regardless of method, shall provide an election board official with


documentary proof of citizenship.


C. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall update this


state’s voter registration form to:


1. Include a space or box where the applicant is required to


enter the identification number printed on the applicant’s driver


license or identification card issued by Service Oklahoma or to


indicate if the applicant has never been issued a driver license or


identification card in this state;


2. Include a statement instructing the applicant that if the


applicant fails to provide the identification number described in


paragraph 1 of this subsection, the applicant must provide an


election board official with another form of documentary proof of


citizenship or the application will be rejected;

Req. No. 2570 Page 7


3. Include a full explanation of the registration process and a


clear indication that the applicant must be verified as a United


States citizen prior to being registered; and


4. Require the applicant to sign affirming that:


a. the information the applicant has provided in the


application is accurate,


b. the documentary proof of citizenship the applicant has


provided in connection with such application is, to


the best of his or her knowledge, sufficient for an


election board official to verify the applicant’s


United States citizenship, and


c. the applicant will provide additional documentation or


information to an election board official as necessary


to verify the applicant’s United States citizenship.


D. No applicant shall be registered to vote in this state as a


verified voter unless and until an election board official verifies


that the applicant is a citizen of the United States, provided that:


1. For applicants submitting the National Mail Voter


Registration Form, if an election board official is unable to verify


that an applicant is a citizen of the United States but the


applicant otherwise satisfies all applicable legal requirements to


register to vote in this state, the election board official shall


register and classify the applicant as a federal-only voter;



Req. No. 2570 Page 8


2. If an election board official verifies an applicant is not a


citizen of the United States, the election board official shall


reject the application. The election board official shall forward


the applicant’s information and supporting documentation to the


appropriate law enforcement agency and prosecutorial authority; and


3. The voter registration records maintained for registered


voters shall clearly and accurately indicate each voter’s current


classification as a verified voter or federal-only voter. Verified


voters shall not be required to resubmit documentary proof of


citizenship during subsequent updates to their voter registration.


E. An election board official shall register federal-only


voters in a manner that designates each voter’s registration as


federal-only.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-112.2 of Title 26, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. When processing a voter registration application, an


election board official shall use all available resources to verify


the applicant is a citizen of the United States, including relevant


information from the following records:


1. Service Oklahoma’s electronic database;


2. The Social Security Administration database;


3. The United States Citizenship and Immigration Services


Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements program;

Req. No. 2570 Page 9


4. A national association for public health statistics and


information systems electronic verification of vital events system


(or similar state database); and


5. Any other federal, state, or political subdivision database


and any other database relating to voter registration to which an


election board official has or is granted access.


B. After processing a voter registration application, an


election board official shall notify the applicant in writing:


1. If the applicant was rejected because he or she was verified


as not being a citizen of the United States; or


2. If, for an applicant submitting the National Mail Voter


Registration Form who could not be verified as a citizen of the


United States, the applicant is registered to vote as a federal-only


voter and the process for submitting documentary proof of


citizenship to an election board official to become classified as a


verified voter.


C. To the extent allowed under applicable law, the Secretary of


the State Election Board shall enter into agreements with the


entities described in subsection A of this section to allow election


board officials in this state to request and obtain records or


information relating to an applicant’s citizenship status. The


Secretary shall have the discretion to enter agreements with other


entities than those described in subsection A of this section to


carry out the provisions of this act.

Req. No. 2570 Page 10


D. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall promulgate


rules to implement the provisions and requirements of this act


within one hundred eighty (180) days of it becoming effective.


E. Federal-only voters may only vote by physical appearance at


an appropriate polling place. Federal-only voters shall follow the


same procedures and rules when marking and casting their ballots


that are applicable to in-person voting at their respective polling


place except as otherwise provided in subsection F of this section.


A federal-only voter is only qualified to vote in federal contests.


Votes cast in elections that are not federal contests shall not be


counted unless the federal-only voter provides documentary proof of


citizenship to an election board official within the time limit


provided in subsection F of this section.


F. A federal-only voter, pursuant to Section 7-116.1 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall use a provisional ballot to vote.


Provisional voting materials shall clearly reflect that the reason


for voting provisionally is that the voter is classified as a


federal-only voter.


1. At any time prior to 1:00 p.m. on the Friday following an


election, a federal-only voter shall have the opportunity to provide


an election board official with documentary proof of citizenship.


If a federal-only voter is verified to be a United States citizen,


all votes cast on that voter’s ballot shall be counted and an



Req. No. 2570 Page 11


election board official shall update the voter’s registration record


as a verified voter.


2. No later than 5:00 p.m. on the Monday following an election,


the State Election Board shall send written notice to every federal-


only voter who submitted a ballot in that election informing the


voter of the disposition of his or her ballot and any updates to his


or her voter registration record.


G. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall design,


prepare, and distribute a standardized written notice form that


shall be provided to each federal-only voter who appears to vote.


The notice shall inform the voter that:


1. An election board official was unable to verify the voter as


a citizen of the United States;


2. The voter is only qualified to vote in federal contests;


3. If the voter wishes for his or her full ballot to be


counted, he or she must provide documentary proof of citizenship to


an election board official at any time prior to 1:00 p.m. on the


Friday following the election; and


4. If the voter takes no action, or if his or her documentary


proof of citizenship cannot be verified, only votes cast in federal


contests will be counted.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-112.3 of Title 26, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 2570 Page 12


A. Any records, documents, or correspondence relating to the


verification of citizenship by an election board official, and any


changes made to voter registration records as a result, shall be


considered voter list maintenance records and shall be retained for


a period of twenty-four (24) months after the day of the election.


B. Any records, documents, or correspondence pertaining to the


verification of a voter’s citizenship status shall be included in


that voter’s corresponding voter registration record for the


duration of that voter’s status as a registered voter in this state.


C. If a federal agency described in subsection A of Section 3


of this act terminates access to citizenship data by an election


board official, the Attorney General shall seek redress in a court


of law.


D. 1. It shall be unlawful for any election official to


knowingly and intentionally cause an individual who has not been


verified as a citizen of the United States to be classified as a


verified voter. Violations of this provision shall be punishable as


a felony.


2. It shall be unlawful for any election official to knowingly


and intentionally cause an individual who has been determined to not


be a citizen of the United States to be registered to vote.


Violations of this provision shall be punishable as a felony.


3. It shall be unlawful for any person who is not a citizen of


the United States to knowingly and intentionally apply to register

Req. No. 2570 Page 13


to vote. Violations of this provision shall be punishable as a


felony.


4. It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly and


intentionally count, tabulate, or otherwise cause to be counted,


votes cast in any race other than a federal contest by a federal-


only voter unless that voter has been verified as a citizen of the


United States pursuant to paragraph 1 of Section 3 of this act.


Violations of this provision shall be punishable as a felony.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2570 BLB 1/14/2026 9:30:58 AM





















Req. No. 2570 Page 14